Utah statutes.
9-6-504.   Duties of board.

The board shall:

(1)  allocate money from the state fund to the endowment fund created by a qualifying organization under Section 9-6-503;

(2)  determine the eligibility of each qualifying organization to receive money from the state fund into the endowment fund of the qualifying organization and be the final arbiter of eligibility;

(3)  determine the matching amount each qualifying organization shall raise in order to qualify to receive money from the state fund;

(4)  establish a date by which each qualifying organization shall provide its matching funds;

(5)  verify that matching funds have been provided by each qualifying organization by the date determined in Subsection (4); and

(6)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, establish criteria by rule not otherwise prescribed in this chapter for determining the eligibility of qualifying organizations to receive money from the state fund.

